District of Columbia statutes.
4-1302.08

Penalty for unauthorized release of information.

Any staff member of the Child Protection Register who willfully releases information obtained from the Register in violation of this subchapter shall be fined not more than $1,000.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title II, § 208, 24 DCR 3341
1981 Ed., § 6-2118.
1973 Ed., § 6-2118.